Maryland, session 2025, SB0435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
11–409.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0435*

SENATE BILL 435
(A) THE GOVERNING BODY OF EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION
SHALL DESIGNATE A TITLE VI COORDINATOR TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH TITLE
VI OF THE FEDERAL CIVIL RIGHTS ACT OF 1964.
(B) A TITLE VI COORDINATOR SHALL:
(1) HAVE EXPERTISE IN AND OVERSEE COMPLIANCE WITH TITLE VI
LAW AND REGULATIONS;
(2) PROMOTE EQUAL ACCESS TO AND PARTICIPATION IN THE
PROGRAMS AND ACTIVITIES OF THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION;
(3) PROVIDE TRAINING AND EDUCATIONAL RESOURCES REGARDING
TITLE VI LAW AND REGULATIONS;
(4) DOCUMENT AND INVESTIGATE COMPLAINTS;
(5) MAINTAIN RECORDS AND REPORTS; AND
(6) PERFORM ANY OTHER RELEVANT DUTIES ESTABLISHED BY THE
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
26–705.
(a) (1) A person alleging discrimination in violation of § 26–704 of this subtitle
may file a complaint with the State Superintendent OR, IF APPLICABLE, THE TITLE VI
COORDINATOR OF THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM OR BOTH.
(2) A complaint filed under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall specify
the relief or remedy requested.
(3) A parent or guardian of a minor alleging discrimination may submit a
complaint under this subsection on behalf of the minor.
26–706.
(A) EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL DESIGNATE A TITLE VI
COORDINATOR TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH TITLE VI OF THE FEDERAL CIVIL
RIGHTS ACT OF 1964.
(B) A TITLE VI COORDINATOR SHALL:
(1) HAVE EXPERTISE IN AND OVERSEE COMPLIANCE WITH TITLE VI
LAW AND REGULATIONS;

SENATE BILL 435 3
(2) PROMOTE EQUAL ACCESS TO AND PARTICIPATION IN THE
PROGRAMS AND ACTIVITIES OF THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM;
(3) PROVIDE TRAINING AND EDUCATIONAL RESOURCES REGARDING
TITLE VI LAW AND REGULATIONS;
(4) DOCUMENT COMPLAINTS;
(5) FORWARD COMPLAINTS TO THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 26–705 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(6) MAINTAIN RECORDS AND REPORTS; AND
(7) PERFORM ANY OTHER RELEVANT DUTIES ESTABLISHED BY THE
LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.